District of Columbia statutes.
47-2887.18

Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The provisions of this part governing the legal effect, validity, or enforceability of electronic records or signatures, and of contracts formed or performed with the use of such records or signatures conform to the requirements of section 102 of the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 467; 5 U.S.C. § 7002 ) (“Act”), and supersede, modify, and limit the Act.

History

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-107, § 3, 49 DCR 1193)

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 19 of the Uniform Athlete Agents Act.